New York, session 2025-2026, A4436.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph 47 to read as follows: 3 (47) The receipts from the first thirty-five thousand dollars of the 4 retail sale or lease of a new or used battery, electric, or plug-in 5 hybrid electric vehicle. For purposes of this paragraph the term 6 "battery, electric, or plug-in hybrid electric vehicle" means a motor 7 vehicle, as defined in section one hundred twenty-five of the vehicle 8 and traffic law, that: 9 (i) has four wheels; 10 (ii) was manufactured for use primarily on public streets, roads and 11 highways; 12 (iii) the powertrain of which has not been modified from the original 13 manufacturer's specifications; 14 (iv) is rated at not more than eight thousand five hundred pounds 15 gross vehicle weight; 16 (v) has a maximum speed capability of at least fifty-five miles per 17 hour; and 18 (vi) is propelled at least in part by an electronic motor and associ- 19 ated power electronics which provide acceleration torque to the drive 20 wheels sometime during normal vehicle operation, and that draws elec- 21 tricity from a battery that: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07767-01-5 A. 4436 2 1 (A) has a capacity of not less than four kilowatt hours; and 2 (B) is capable of being recharged from an external source of electric- 3 ity. 4 § 2. Section 1160 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subdivi- 5 sion (d) to read as follows: 6 (d) The new or used battery, electric, or plug-in hybrid electric 7 vehicles exemption provided for in paragraph forty-seven of subdivision 8 (a) of section eleven hundred fifteen of this chapter shall not apply to 9 or limit the imposition of the tax imposed pursuant to this article. 10 § 3. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph 1 of subdivision (a) of section 11 1210 of the tax law, as amended by section 5 of part J of chapter 59 of 12 the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 13 (ii) Any local law, ordinance or resolution enacted by any city, coun- 14 ty or school district, imposing the taxes authorized by this subdivi- 15 sion, shall omit the residential solar energy systems equipment and 16 electricity exemption provided for in subdivision (ee), the commercial 17 solar energy systems equipment and electricity exemption provided for in 18 subdivision (ii), the commercial fuel cell electricity generating 19 systems equipment and electricity generated by such equipment exemption 20 provided for in subdivision (kk) [and], the clothing and footwear 21 exemption provided for in paragraph thirty of subdivision (a) of section 22 eleven hundred fifteen of this chapter, and the battery, electric, or 23 plug-in hybrid electric vehicle exemption provided for in paragraph 24 forty-seven of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred fifteen of this 25 chapter unless such city, county or school district elects otherwise as 26 to such residential solar energy systems equipment and electricity 27 exemption, such commercial solar energy systems equipment and electric- 28 ity exemption, commercial fuel cell electricity generating systems 29 equipment and electricity generated by such equipment exemption [or], 30 such clothing and footwear exemption, or such battery, electric, or 31 plug-in hybrid electric vehicle exemption provided for in paragraph 32 forty-seven of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred fifteen of this 33 chapter. 34 § 4. Paragraph 47 of subdivision (a) of section 1115 of the tax law, 35 as added by section one of this act, is amended to read as follows: 36 (47) The receipts from the first thirty-five thousand dollars of the 37 retail sale or lease of a new or used battery[,] or electric[, or plug- 38 in hybrid electric] vehicle. For purposes of this paragraph the term 39 "battery[,] or electric[, or plug-in hybrid electric] vehicle" means a 40 motor vehicle, as defined in section one hundred twenty-five of the 41 vehicle and traffic law, that: 42 (i) has four wheels; 43 (ii) was manufactured for use primarily on public streets, roads and 44 highways; 45 (iii) the powertrain of which has not been modified from the original 46 manufacturer's specifications; 47 (iv) is rated at not more than eight thousand five hundred pounds 48 gross vehicle weight; 49 (v) has a maximum speed capability of at least fifty-five miles per 50 hour; and 51 (vi) is propelled [at least in part] by an electronic motor and asso- 52 ciated power electronics which provide acceleration torque to the drive 53 wheels sometime during normal vehicle operation, and that draws elec- 54 tricity from a battery that: 55 (A) has a capacity of not less than four kilowatt hours; and A. 4436 3 1 (B) is capable of being recharged from an external source of electric- 2 ity. 3 § 5. Subdivision (d) of section 1160 of the tax law, as added by 4 section two of this act, is amended to read as follows: 5 (d) The new or used battery[,] or electric[, or plug-in hybrid elec- 6 tric] vehicles exemption provided for in paragraph forty-seven of subdi- 7 vision (a) of section eleven hundred fifteen of this chapter shall not 8 apply to or limit the imposition of the tax imposed pursuant to this 9 article. 10 § 6. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph 1 of subdivision (a) of section 11 1210 of the tax law, as amended by section three of this act, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 (ii) Any local law, ordinance or resolution enacted by any city, coun- 14 ty or school district, imposing the taxes authorized by this subdivi- 15 sion, shall omit the residential solar energy systems equipment and 16 electricity exemption provided for in subdivision (ee), the commercial 17 solar energy systems equipment and electricity exemption provided for in 18 subdivision (ii), the commercial fuel cell electricity generating 19 systems equipment and electricity generated by such equipment exemption 20 provided for in subdivision (kk), the clothing and footwear exemption 21 provided for in paragraph thirty of subdivision (a) of section eleven 22 hundred fifteen of this chapter, and the battery[,] or electric[, or 23 plug-in hybrid electric] vehicle exemption provided for in paragraph 24 forty-seven of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred fifteen of this 25 chapter unless such city, county or school district elects otherwise as 26 to such residential solar energy systems equipment and electricity 27 exemption, such commercial solar energy systems equipment and electric- 28 ity exemption, commercial fuel cell electricity generating systems 29 equipment and electricity generated by such equipment exemption, such 30 clothing and footwear exemption, or such battery[,] or electric[, or 31 plug-in hybrid electric] vehicle exemption provided for in paragraph 32 forty-seven of subdivision (a) of section eleven hundred fifteen of this 33 chapter. 34 § 7. This act shall take effect on the first day of a sales tax quar- 35 terly period, as described in subdivision (b) of section 1136 of the tax 36 law, beginning at least one hundred twenty days after the date this act 37 shall have become a law and shall apply to sales made on or after such 38 date; provided, however, that sections four, five and six of this act 39 shall take effect ten years after such effective date and shall apply to 40 sales made on and after such date.